Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 55.1-2100.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter or in the declaration and bylaws, unless provided otherwise or unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affiliate of a declarant”
means any person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a declarant. A person “controls” a declarant if the person (i) is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the declarant; (ii) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the declarant; (iii) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant; or (iv) has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the declarant. A person “is controlled by” a declarant if the declarant (a) is a general partner, officer, director, or employer of the person; (b) directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than 20 percent of the voting interest in the person; (c) controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or (d) has contributed more than 20 percent of the capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described in this definition are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

“Allocated interests”
means the common expense liability and the ownership interest and votes in the association allocated to each cooperative interest.

“Association”
or

“proprietary lessees’ association”

means the proprietary lessees’ association organized under §

55.1-2132

.

“Capital components”
means those items, whether or not a part of the common elements, for which the association has the obligation for repair, replacement, or restoration and for which the executive board determines funding is necessary.

“Common elements”
means all portions of a cooperative other than the units of such cooperative.

“Common expenses”
means any expenditures made by, or financial liabilities of, the association, together with any allocations to reserves.

“Common expense liability”
means liability for common expenses allocated to each cooperative interest pursuant to §

55.1-2118

.

“Conversion building”
means a building that at any time before creation of the cooperative was occupied wholly or partially by persons other than purchasers and persons who occupy with the consent of purchasers.

“Cooperative”
means real estate owned by an association, each of the members of which is entitled, by virtue of his ownership interest in the association, to exclusive possession of a unit.

“Cooperative interest”
means an ownership interest in the association coupled with a possessory interest in a unit under a proprietary lease. For purposes of this chapter, a declarant is treated as the owner of any cooperative interests or potential cooperative interests to which allocated interests have been allocated pursuant to §

55.1-2118

until that cooperative interest has been created and conveyed to another person.

“Declarant”
means any person or group of persons acting in concert that (i) as part of a common promotional plan, offers to dispose of its cooperative interest not previously disposed of; (ii) reserves or succeeds to any special declarant right; or (iii) applies for registration of a cooperative under Article 5 (§

55.1-2173

et seq.).

“Declaration”
means any instruments, however denominated, that create a cooperative and any amendments to those instruments.

“Development rights”
means any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to (i) add real estate to a cooperative; (ii) create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a cooperative; (iii) subdivide units or convert units into common elements; or (iv) withdraw real estate from a cooperative.

“Dispose”
or

“disposition”

means a voluntary transfer to a purchaser of any legal or equitable interest in a cooperative interest, but does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.

“Executive board”
means the body, regardless of name, designated in the declaration to act on behalf of the association.

“Identifying number”
means a symbol or address that identifies only one unit in a cooperative.

“Leasehold cooperative”
means a cooperative in which all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a lease the expiration or termination of which will terminate the cooperative or reduce its size.

“Limited common element”
means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of subdivision 2 or 4 of §

55.1-2113

for the exclusive use of at least one unit but fewer than all of the units.

“Master association”
means an organization described in §

55.1-2130

, whether or not it is also an association described in §

55.1-2132

.

“Offering”
means any advertisement, inducement, solicitation, or attempt to encourage any person to acquire any interest in a cooperative interest, other than as security for an obligation. An advertisement in a newspaper or other periodical of general circulation, or in any broadcast medium to the general public, of a cooperative not located in the Commonwealth is not an offering if the advertisement states that an offering may be made only in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the cooperative is located.

“Person”
means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity. In the case of a land trust, however, “person” means the beneficiary of the trust rather than the trust or the trustee.

“Proprietary lease”
means an agreement with the association pursuant to which a proprietary lessee has a possessory interest in a unit.

“Proprietary lessee”
means a person that owns a cooperative interest, other than as security for an obligation, and the declarant with respect to cooperative interests or potential cooperative interests to which allocated interests have been allocated pursuant to §

55.1-2118

until that cooperative interest has been created and conveyed to another person.

“Purchaser”
means any person, other than a declarant or a person in the business of selling cooperative interests for his own account, that, by means of a voluntary transfer, acquires or contracts to acquire a cooperative interest other than as security for an obligation.

“Real estate”
means any leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests that, by custom, usage, or law, pass with a conveyance of land though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. “Real estate” includes (i) parcels with or without upper or lower boundaries and (ii) spaces that may be filled with air or water.

“Residential purposes”
means use for dwelling or recreational purposes, or both.

“Security interest”
means an interest in real or personal property, created by contract or conveyance, that secures payment or performance of an obligation. “Security interest” includes a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, security deed, contract for deed, land sales contract, lease intended as security, assignment of lease or rents intended as security, pledge of an ownership interest in an association, and any other consensual lien or title retention contract intended as security for an obligation.

“Special declarant rights”
means rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to (i) complete improvements described in the public offering statement pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

55.1-2155

; (ii) exercise any development right pursuant to §

55.1-2120

; (iii) maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the cooperative, and models; (iv) use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the cooperative or within real estate that may be added to the cooperative; (v) make the cooperative part of a larger cooperative or group of cooperatives; (vi) make the cooperative subject to a master association as specified in §

55.1-2130

; or (vii) appoint or remove any officer of the association, any master association, or any executive board member during any period of declarant control.

“Time share”
means a right to occupy a unit or any of several units during five or more separated time periods over a period of at least five years, including renewal options, whether or not coupled with an estate or interest in a cooperative or a specified portion of such estate or interest.

“Unit”
means a physical portion of the cooperative designated for separate occupancy under a proprietary lease.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-426; 2005, c. 436; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For comment on residential associations and the concept of consensual governance, see 9 G.M.U. L. Rev. 91 (1986).

§ 55.1-2101.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to all cooperatives created within the Commonwealth after July 1, 1982. Unless the declaration provides that the entire chapter is applicable, such a cooperative is subject only to §§

55.1-2104

and

55.1-2105

if the cooperative contains only units restricted to nonresidential use or contains no more than three units and is not subject to any development rights.

Except as provided in subsection C, §§

55.1-2100

,

55.1-2104

,

55.1-2105

,

55.1-2109

,

55.1-2114

, and

55.1-2131

, subdivisions A 1 through 6 and 11 through 17 of §

55.1-2133

, and §§

55.1-2143

,

55.1-2148

,

55.1-2151

,

55.1-2161

,

55.1-2169

, and

55.1-2170

apply to all cooperatives created in the Commonwealth before July 1, 1982. Those sections apply only with respect to events and circumstances occurring after July 1, 1982, and do not invalidate existing provisions of the cooperative documents of those cooperatives. With regard to any cooperative created before July 1, 1982, §

55.1-2104

applies only to real estate acquired by that cooperative’s association on or after that date. For the purposes of this section, a cooperative was created before July 1, 1982, if the cooperative was conveyed to the association before that date.

If a cooperative created within the Commonwealth before July 1, 1982, contains no more than three units and is not subject to any development rights, it is subject only to §§

55.1-2104

and

55.1-2105

, unless the declaration is amended to make any or all of the sections enumerated in subsection B apply to that cooperative.

This chapter does not apply to cooperatives or cooperative interests located outside the Commonwealth, but the public offering statement provisions as given in §§

55.1-2153

through

55.1-2160

apply to all contracts for the disposition of cooperative interests signed in the Commonwealth by any party, unless exempt under subsection B of §

55.1-2153

. The Common Interest Community Board regulations provisions under Article 5 (§

55.1-2173

et seq.) apply to any such offering in the Commonwealth.

This chapter does not apply to any cooperatives that receive federal funding pursuant to the public housing or Section 8 program under the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended.

This chapter does not apply to any cooperative that, when acquired by an association, is subject to a mortgage or deed of trust securing an indebtedness owed to any government or governmental authority to which the association has contractual obligations in addition to those set forth in such mortgage or deed of trust.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-425; 1983, c. 312; 1986, cc. 368, 557; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2102.
Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, provisions of this chapter shall not be varied by agreement, and rights conferred by this chapter shall not be waived. A declarant shall not act under a power of attorney, or use any other device, to evade the limitations or prohibitions of this chapter or the declaration.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-427; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2103.
Property classification of cooperative interests; taxation.

A cooperative interest is real estate for all purposes. Unless waived by a proprietary lessee, a cooperative interest is subject to the provisions of Title 34 (§

34-1

et seq.), regarding the homestead exemption.

Any portion of the common elements for which the declarant has reserved any development right shall be separately taxed and assessed against the declarant, and the declarant alone is liable for the payment of those taxes.

When the highest and best use of any parcel improved by a multi-unit cooperative apartment complex is achieved by sale of the cooperative apartment units as individual units, the fair market value of the parcel shall be determined by aggregating the fair market value of all taxable real estate that is part of the parcel, including each cooperative apartment unit and common elements. The fair market value of each such cooperative apartment unit shall be established by determining its fair market value for sale as an individual unit, determined in the same manner, mutatis mutandis, as the fair market value of condominium units. Tax bills shall be issued for each individual cooperative apartment unit.No assessment of any parcel improved by a multi-unit cooperative apartment complex, whether the assessment was made before or after the adoption of this subsection, shall be held to be invalid because of the use of the method described in this subsection to determine the assessment.

Any duly authorized real estate assessor, board of assessors, or department of real estate assessments may require that all declarants, associations, master associations, and proprietary lessees’ associations in the county or city subject to local taxation furnish to such assessor, board, or department on or before a time specified a statement listing all transfers of the cooperative apartment units over a specified period of time and a statement listing all owners and proprietary lessees of the cooperative apartment units as of a specified date. Each such statement shall be certified as to its accuracy by the declarant, association, master association, or proprietary lessees’ association for which the statement is furnished or by a duly authorized agent of such declarant or association. Any statement required by this subsection shall be kept confidential in accordance with the provisions of §

58.1-3

.

Subsections C and D apply to all cooperatives created in the Commonwealth, whether created before, on, or after July 1, 1982. However, subsections C and D do not apply to any multi-unit cooperative apartment complex the cooperative apartment units of which have been continually in use as such since December 31, 1967.

Any residential cooperative association the members of which are owners of cooperative interests in a cooperative under this chapter shall not be deemed to be a business for any state and local purposes, including liability for payment of sales, meals, hotel, motel, or gross receipts taxes and business licenses, to the extent that such residential cooperative association collects payments from residents of such cooperative.

Any tangible personal property owned by a residential cooperative association that would be considered household goods and personal effects if owned and used by an individual or by a family or household incident to maintaining an abode shall be considered household goods and personal effects owned and used by an individual or by a family or household incident to maintaining an abode for the purposes of §

58.1-3504

and any local ordinance authorized pursuant to §

58.1-3504

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-428; 1988, c. 412; 2002, c. 34; 2003, c. 351; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

The 2002 amendment to this section

is not declaratory of the law existing prior to July 1; additionally, it is not retroactive in its application, and the tax exemptions provided therein for residential cooperative associations are applicable as of the effective date of the amendment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terrie L. Suit, Member, House of Delegates, 02-062,
(8/14/02).

§ 55.1-2104.
Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, and building codes; local authority.

No zoning or other land use ordinance shall prohibit cooperatives as such by reason of their form of ownership. No cooperative shall be treated differently by any zoning or other land use ordinance that would permit a physically identical project or development under a different form of ownership.

Subdivision and site plan ordinances in any locality shall apply to any cooperative in the same manner as such ordinances would apply to a physically identical project or development under a different form of ownership. Nevertheless, the declarant need not apply for or obtain subdivision approval to record cooperative instruments against a portion of the land that may be submitted to the cooperative if the site plan approval for the land being submitted to the cooperative has first been obtained.

During development of a cooperative containing additional land or withdrawable land, phase lines created by the cooperative instruments shall not be considered property lines for purposes of subdivision. If the cooperative may no longer be expanded by the addition of additional land, the owner of the land not part of the cooperative shall subdivide such land prior to its conveyance, unless such land is subject to an approved site plan as provided in subsection B, or prior to modification of such approved site plan. In the event of any conveyance of land within phase lines of the cooperative, the cooperative and any lot created by such conveyance shall be deemed to comply with the local subdivision ordinance, provided that such land is subject to an approved site plan.

Localities may provide by ordinance that proposed cooperatives comprising conversion buildings and the use of such conversion buildings that do not conform to the zoning, land use, and site plan regulations of the respective county or city in which the property is located shall secure a special use permit, a special exception, or variance, as applicable, prior to such property’s becoming a cooperative. The local authority shall grant a request for such a special use permit, special exception, or variance filed on or after July 1, 1982, if the applicant can demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the local authority that the nonconformities are not likely to be adversely affected by the proposed conversion. The local authority shall not unreasonably delay action on any such request. In the event of an approved conversion, a locality, sanitary district, or other political subdivision may impose such charges and fees as are lawfully imposed by such locality, sanitary district, or other political subdivision as a result of construction of new structures to the extent that such charges and fees, or portions of such charges and fees, imposed upon property subject to such conversions may be reasonably related to greater or additional services provided by the locality, sanitary district, or political subdivision as a result of the conversion.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit application of any provision of the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.), or any local ordinances regulating the design and construction of roads, sewer and water lines, stormwater management facilities, or other public infrastructure, that is not expressly applicable to cooperatives by reason of their form of ownership to a cooperative in a manner different from the manner in which such provision is applied to other buildings of similar physical form and nature of occupancy.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-429; 2004, c. 242; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2105.
Eminent domain.

If a unit is acquired by eminent domain, or if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain leaving the proprietary lessee with a remnant that may not practically or lawfully be used for any purpose permitted by the declaration, the award for such unit shall include compensation to the proprietary lessee for the value of his cooperative interest. Upon acquisition, unless the order otherwise provides, that cooperative interest’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated to the remaining cooperative interests in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those cooperative interests before the taking, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Any remnant of a unit remaining after part of a unit is taken under this subsection is thereafter a common element.

Except as provided in subsection A, if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain, the award for such unit shall compensate the proprietary lessee for the reduction in value of his cooperative interest. Unless the order provides otherwise, upon acquisition (i) that cooperative interest’s allocated interests are reduced in proportion to the reduction in the size of the unit, or on any other basis specified in the declaration, and (ii) the portion of the allocated interests divested from the cooperative interest of which the partially acquired unit is a part is automatically reallocated to that cooperative interest and the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those cooperative interests before the taking, with the cooperative interest of which the partially acquired unit is a part participating in the reallocation on the basis of its reduced allocated interests.

If part of the common elements is acquired by eminent domain, the portion of the award attributable to the common elements taken shall be paid to the association. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any portion of the award attributable to the acquisition of a limited common element shall be equally divided among the proprietary lessees of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time of acquisition.

The court order shall be recorded in every county or city in which any portion of the cooperative is located.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-430; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2106.
General principles of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations and unincorporated associations, the law of real property, and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performances, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement the provisions of this chapter, except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-431; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2107.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This chapter, being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, shall not be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-432; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2108.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed so as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to cooperatives in the Commonwealth.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-433; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2109.
Unconscionable agreement or term of contract.

The court, upon finding as a matter of law that a contract or contract clause was unconscionable at the time the contract was made, may (i) refuse to enforce the contract, (ii) enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or (iii) limit the application of any unconscionable clause in order to avoid an unconscionable result.

Whenever it is claimed, or appears to the court, that a contract or any contract clause is or may be unconscionable, the parties, in order to aid the court in making the determination, shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to:

The commercial setting of the negotiations;

Whether a party has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of the other party to reasonably protect his interests by reason of physical or mental infirmity, illiteracy, or inability to understand the language of the agreement or similar factors;

The effect and purpose of the contract or clause; and

If a sale, any gross disparity at the time of contracting between the amount charged for the cooperative interest and the value of the cooperative interest measured by the price at which similar cooperative interests were readily obtainable in similar transactions; however, a disparity between the contract price and the value of the cooperative interest measured by the price at which similar cooperative interests were readily obtainable in similar transactions does not, of itself, render the contract unconscionable.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-434; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2110.
Obligation of good faith.

Every contract or duty governed by this chapter imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-435; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2111.
Remedies to be liberally administered.

The remedies provided by this chapter shall be liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party is put in a position as good as its position had the other party fully performed. However, consequential, special, or punitive damages may not be awarded except as specifically provided in this chapter or by other rule of law.

Any right or obligation declared by this chapter is enforceable by judicial proceeding.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-436; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.